Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 7. Fees.
§ 17.1-275.4.
Fixed misdemeanor reduced from felony revocation fee.

In circuit court, when a person whose charge was reduced from a felony charge is convicted of a misdemeanor and subsequently suffers partial or full revocation of his suspension of sentence or probation pursuant to §

19.2-306

, other than a revocation for failure to pay previously assessed court costs, he shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $114.50 to be known as the fixed misdemeanor reduced from felony revocation fee. A single fixed misdemeanor reduced from felony revocation fee shall be assessed per defendant per hearing without regard to the number of misdemeanor revocations being considered except that if a revocation of probation or suspended sentence upon a felony conviction is also being considered at the same revocation proceeding, a single fixed felony revocation fee shall apply instead. The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed misdemeanor reduced from felony revocation fee shall be apportioned, as provided by law, to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0262009);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0349345);

Witness expenses/expert witness fund (.0174672);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (state share) (.1746725);

Commonwealth’s attorney fund (local share) (.1746725);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.1746725);

Regional Criminal Justice Training Academy Fund (.0087336);

Warrant fee, as prescribed by §

17.1-272

(.1048035); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.2838428).

History.

1999, c. 9; 2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2011, c. 565.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, in the first sentence of the introductory language, added “In circuit court” at the beginning and substituted “eighty-seven dollars and fifty cents” for “$87.50”; and inserted “reduced from felony” following “misdemeanor” throughout; and in the fee table, added “as prescribed by §

17.1-272

” following “Warrant fee” in entry 8.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$89.50” for “eighty-seven dollars and fifty cents” in the introductory language; and changed the fractional amounts in subdivisions 1 through 9.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed misdemeanor reduced from felony fees.

§ 17.1-275.5.
Amounts to be added; judgment in favor of the Commonwealth.

The clerk shall assess, in addition to the fees provided for by §

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

,

17.1-275.9

,

17.1-275.1

0,

17.1-275.11

,

17.1-275.11

:1, or

17.1-275.12

, the following costs:

Any amount paid by the Commonwealth for legal representation of the defendant;

Any amount paid for trial transcripts;

Extradition costs;

Costs of psychiatric evaluation;

Costs taxed against the defendant as appellant under Rule 5A:30 of the Rules of the Supreme Court;

Any fee for a returned check or disallowed credit card charge assessed pursuant to subdivision A 28 of §

17.1-275

;

Any jury costs;

Any assessment made pursuant to subdivision A 10 of §

17.1-275

;

Any fees prescribed in §§

18.2-268.8

and

46.2-341.26:8

;

Any court costs related to an ignition interlock device;

Any fee for testing for HIV;

Any fee for processing an individual admitted to jail as prescribed in §

15.2-1613.1

;

Any fee for courthouse security personnel as prescribed in §

53.1-120

;

Any fee for a DNA sample as prescribed in §

19.2-310.2

;

Reimbursement to the Commonwealth of medical fees as prescribed in §

19.2-165.1

;

Any fee for a local criminal justice training academy as prescribed in §

9.1-106

;

Any fee prescribed by §§ 16.1-69.48:1.01 and 17.1-275.11;

Any expenses charged pursuant to subsection B or F of §

19.2-187.1

; and

Any fee for an electronic summons system as prescribed in §

17.1-279.1

.

The total amount of assessments described in subsection A, including (i) the fees provided for by §

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

,

17.1-275.9

,

17.1-275.1

0,

17.1-275.11

,

17.1-275.11:1

, or

17.1-275.12

and (ii) all other fines and costs, shall be docketed by the clerk as a judgment against the defendant in favor of the Commonwealth in accordance with §

8.01-446

.

History.

1999, c. 9; 2002, c. 831; 2003, cc. 1001, 1022, 1039; 2010, c. 555; 2012, c. 714; 2013, c. 263; 2014, c. 325; 2015, c. 641.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “the fees provided for by §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275

.3,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, or §

17.1-275

.9” for “the fixed felony fee, the fixed fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor, or the fixed revocation fee, as the case may be” in the introductory language of subsection A; substituted “subdivision A. 28. of § 17.1-275” for “§

17.1-275

A 28” in subdivision A 6; substituted “subdivision A. 10. of § 17.1-275” for “§

17.1-275

A 10” in subdivision A 8; added subdivisions A 9 through A 13; and substituted “fees provided for by §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, or §

17.1-275.9

” for “fixed felony fee, fixed fee for felony reduced to misdemeanor, fixed felony revocation fee, or fixed misdemeanor revocation fee, as the case may be” in subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 1001 and 1022 are identical, and in subdivision A 9, substituted “fees” for “blood withdrawal fees as.”

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “through

17.1-275.4

” for “17.1-275.2,

17.1-275.3

” in the introductory language in subsections A and B; and added subdivisions A 14 through A 17.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 555 inserted subdivision A 18 and made a related change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 714, in subsection A, substituted “by §

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

” for “by §§

17.1-275.1

through

17.1-275.4

” and deleted the section symbol preceding “17.1-275.9” in the first paragraph; and in subsection B, deleted “of this section” following “subsection A,” substituted “by § 17.1-275.1,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

, 17.1-275.4” for “by §§

17.1-275.1

through 17.1-275.4” and “or

17.1-275.9

, shall be docketed” for “or §

17.1-275.9

, and no other, shall be forthwith docketed” and added “in accordance with §

8.01-446

.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 263 inserted “17.1-275.10,

17.1-275.11

,

17.1-275.11

:1, or

17.1-275.12

” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A; inserted “17.1-275.10, 17.1-275.11,

17.1-275.11:1

, or

17.1-275.12

” in subsection B, and made related changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 325 added subdivision A 19 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 641 in subsection B, added the subdivision (i) designation and inserted “and (ii) all other fines and costs.”

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Court cannot waive costs. —

A trial court has no authority to waive all or any portion of statutorily mandated court costs. Commonwealth v. Terembes, 54 Va. Cir. 193, 2000 Va. Cir. LEXIS 572 (Spotsylvania County 2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Assessment of expenses for indigent defendant. —

An indigent criminal defendant convicted in a circuit court may be taxed for court-approved, reasonable expenses in addition to, and over and above the court-appointed counsel pre-waiver compensation limit set forth in subdivision 2 of §

19.2-163

. Sections

17.1-275.5

and

19.2-163

must be read together to determine the amount of combined court-appointed counsel compensation and approved expenses that may be assessed. The amount of expenses that may be assessed against such a defendant who is represented by an attorney from a public defender or capital defender office is not limited by the court-appointed counsel pre-waiver compensation limit set forth in subdivision 2 of §

19.2-163

.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Cathy C. Hogan, Clerk of the Circuit Court of Bedford County, 13-095, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 100 (12/27/13).

§ 17.1-275.6.
Fees collected from court reporter fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any court in which electronic devices are used for recording testimony, a sum not to exceed twenty dollars for each day or part of a day of the trial shall be paid by the clerk, from the court reporter fund as set forth in §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

and

17.1-275.3

, or a sum not to exceed five dollars for each day or part of a day of the trial of a case wherein costs are assessed pursuant to §

17.1-275.8

shall be paid by the clerk, from the court reporter fund as set forth in §

17.1-275.8

, into a special fund to be used for the purpose of repairing, replacing or supplementing such electronic devices or, if a sufficient amount is available, to pay the purchase price of such devices in whole or in part. For the purpose of this section, repairing shall include maintenance and service contracts. Fees collected under this article shall be retained locally and shall not be subject to the provisions of §

17.1-286

.

History.

2000, c. 875; 2002, c. 831.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 831, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “§§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

and

17.1-275.3

. . . set forth in §

17.1-275.8

” for “§§

17.1-275.1

through

17.1-275.3

” in the first sentence.

§ 17.1-275.7.
Fixed misdemeanor fee.

In circuit court, upon (i) conviction of any and each misdemeanor, not originally charged as a felony; (ii) a deferred disposition of proceedings in the case of any and each misdemeanor not originally charged as a felony and deferred pursuant to the terms and conditions of §

4.1-305

, 16.1-278.8, 16.1-278.9,

18.2-57.3

,

19.2-298.02

,

19.2-303.2

, or

19.2-303.6

; (iii) any and each conviction of a traffic infraction or referral to a driver improvement clinic or traffic school in lieu of a finding of guilt for a traffic infraction; or (iv) proof of compliance with law under §§

46.2-104

and

46.2-1158.02

, there shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $80, to be known as the fixed misdemeanor fee. However, this section shall not apply to those proceedings provided for in §

17.1-275.8

. This fee shall be in addition to any fee assessed in the district court.

The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed misdemeanor fee shall be apportioned, as provided by law, to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Sentencing/supervision fee (General Fund) (.0125000);

Witness expenses/expert witness fee (General Fund)(.0250000);

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0375000);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0500000);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.2500000);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (state share) (.0937500);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (local share) (.0937500);

Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund (.0125000);

Warrant fee, as prescribed by §

17.1-272

(.1500000);

Courthouse Construction/Maintenance Fund (.0250000); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.2500000).

History.

2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2005, c. 631; 2009, c. 756; 2011, cc. 283, 565; 2020, c. 1004; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 21.

Effective date.

Acts 2002, c. 831, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$70” for “sixty-eight dollars” in the first paragraph; deleted former subdivision 2, which read “Sentencing/supervision fee (local share) (.0110295)”; redesignated former subdivisions 3 through 12 as present subdivisions 2 through 11; and updated the fractional amounts apportioned in subdivisions 1 through 11.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 631 deleted “18.2-67.2:1” preceding “or

19.2-303.2

” in the first paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 756, in the first paragraph, inserted clause (iv) and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 283, in the first paragraph, substituted “§§

46.2-104

and

46.2-1158.02

” for “§§

46.2-104

and

46.2-1157

” in clause (iv) of the first sentence.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed misdemeanor fees.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1004 substituted “19.2-303.2, or

19.2-303.6

” for “or

19.2-303.2

” in clause (ii) in the first sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendment.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 21, effective March 1, 2021, inserted “19.2-298.02” in the clause (ii) in the first paragraph.

§ 17.1-275.8.
Fixed drug misdemeanor fee.

In circuit court, upon conviction of any and each misdemeanor charge, whether or not originally charged as a felony, for a violation of any provision of Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2, or upon a deferred disposition of proceedings in the case of any and each misdemeanor charge, whether or not originally charged as a felony, deferred pursuant to the terms and conditions of §

18.2-251

, there shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $296.50, to be known as the fixed drug misdemeanor fee. This fee shall be in addition to any fee assessed in the district court.

The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed drug misdemeanor fee shall be apportioned, as provided by law, to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Sentencing/supervision fee (General Fund) (.1264755);

Court Reporter Fund (.0168634);

Witness expenses/expert witness fee (General Fund) (.0067454);

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0101180);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0134907);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.0674536);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (state share) (.0252951);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (local share) (.0252951);

Regional Criminal Justice Academy Training Fund (.0033727);

Warrant fee, as prescribed by §

17.1-272

(.0404722);

Courthouse Construction/Maintenance Fund (.0067454);

Clerk of the circuit court (.0674536);

Forensic laboratory fee (General Fund) (.3372681); and

Drug Offender Assessment and Treatment Fund (.2529511).

History.

2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2004, c. 1004; 2011, c. 565.

Effective date.

Acts 2002, c. 831, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$286.50” for “$284.50” in the first paragraph; deleted former subdivision 2, which read: “Sentencing/supervision fee (local share) (.0263620);” redesignated former subdivisions 3 through 15 as present subdivisions 2 through 14; and updated the fractional amounts apportioned in subdivisions 1 through 14.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1004 inserted “and Treatment” in subdivision 14.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed drug misdemeanor fees.

§ 17.1-275.9.
Fixed misdemeanor revocation fee.

In circuit court, when a person is convicted of a misdemeanor not originally charged as a felony and subsequently suffers partial or full revocation of his suspension of sentence or probation pursuant to §

19.2-306

, he shall be assessed as court costs a fee of $77 to be known as the fixed misdemeanor revocation fee. A single fixed misdemeanor revocation fee shall be assessed per defendant per hearing without regard to the number of misdemeanor revocations being considered, except that if a revocation of probation or suspended sentence upon a felony conviction is also being considered at the same revocation proceeding, a single fixed felony revocation fee shall apply instead. The amount collected, in whole or in part, for the fixed misdemeanor revocation fee shall be apportioned, as provided by law, to the following funds in the fractional amounts designated:

Virginia Crime Victim-Witness Fund (.0389610);

Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund (.0519481);

Witness expenses/expert witness fee (General Fund) (.0259740);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (state share) (.0974026);

Commonwealth’s Attorney Fund (local share) (.0974026);

Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund (.2597403);

Regional Criminal Justice Training Academy Fund (.0129870);

Warrant fee, as prescribed by §

17.1-272

(.1558442); and

Clerk of the circuit court (.2597403).

History.

2002, c. 831; 2003, c. 1039; 2011, c. 565.

Effective date.

Acts 2002, c. 831, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1039 substituted “$67” for “sixty-five dollars” in the first sentence of the first paragraph; and updated the fractional amounts apportioned in subdivisions 1 through 9.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 565 rewrote the section, increasing the court cost fee and changing the fixed misdemeanor revocation fees.

§ 17.1-275.10.
Additional fee.

Beginning May 1, 2003, in addition to the fees set forth in §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, and

17.1-275.9

, there shall be assessed as court costs, a fee of $2, at the same time fees in such sections are assessed. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Intensified Drug Enforcement Jurisdiction Fund.

History.

2003, c. 1042, cl. 9.

Effective date.

This section became effective May 1, 2003.

§ 17.1-275.11.
Additional fee assessed for conviction of certain offenses.

Beginning May 1, 2003, the clerk shall assess a person, in addition to the fees provided for by §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.5

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, and

17.1-275.9

, a fee of $100 upon conviction of any and each charge of a violation of §§

18.2-36.1

,

18.2-51.4

,

18.2-266

,

18.2-266.1

,

18.2-268.3

,

46.2-341.24

or §

46.2-341.26:3

, or any similar local ordinance.

History.

2003, c. 1042, cl. 9.

Effective date.

This section became effective May 1, 2003.

§ 17.1-275.11:1.
Additional fee assessed for conviction requiring computer analysis.

In addition to the fees provided for by §§

17.1-275.1

through

17.1-275.5

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

, and

17.1-275.9

, upon a finding of guilty of any charge or charges in which any computer forensic analysis revealed evidence used at trial of a defendant, the defendant may be assessed costs in an amount equal to the actual cost of the computer forensic analysis not to exceed $100 for each computer analyzed by any state or local law-enforcement agency. Upon motion and submission to the court of an affidavit by the law-enforcement agency setting forth the number of computers analyzed and the total amount of costs requested, the court shall determine the appropriate amount to be assessed and order such amount paid to the law-enforcement agency.

History.

2011, c. 511.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2525. Motion for Costs of Computer Forensics.

§ 17.1-275.12.
Additional fee for Internet Crimes Against Children Fund.

In addition to the fees provided for by §§ 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-69.48:1.01,

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.5

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

,

17.1-275.9

,

17.1-275.1

0, and

17.1-275.11

, a fee of $15 upon each felony or misdemeanor conviction shall be assessed as court costs. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state treasury and credited to the Internet Crimes Against Children Fund.

There is hereby established in the state treasury the Internet Crimes Against Children Fund. Such fund shall consist of all fees collected under this section, moneys appropriated directly to the Fund, and any other grants or gifts made to the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be disbursed in the following manner: to the Virginia State Police, 33.3333 percent of the total annual deposits to support the Northern Virginia Internet Crimes Against Children program; to the Department of Criminal Justice Services, 33.3333 percent of the total annual deposits to support the Southern Virginia Internet Crimes Against Children program; to the Department of Criminal Justice Services, 27.7777 percent of the total annual deposits to support grants and training and equipment for local law-enforcement agencies’ use in investigating and prosecuting Internet crimes against children; and to the Department of Social Services, 5.5555 percent of the total annual deposits to support the Virginia Child Protection Accountability System established under §

63.2-1530

.

History.

2010, c. 685; 2014, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 794, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 806 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 794, effective April 23, 2014, in the first paragraph substituted “$15” for “$10.”

§ 17.1-275.13.
Additional fee for offenses related to sex trafficking.

In addition to the fees provided for by §§

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.1

0, and

17.1-275.12

, any person convicted of a misdemeanor violation of §

18.2-346.01

or of §

18.2-348

or

18.2-349

shall be ordered to pay a $100 fee, and any person convicted of a violation of clause (ii), (iii), or (iv) of §

18.2-48

, or of §

18.2-368

, or any felony violation of the laws pertaining to commercial sex trafficking or prostitution offenses pursuant to Article 3 (§

18.2-346

et seq.) of Chapter 8, with the exception of §

18.2-361

, shall be ordered to pay a $500 fee. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Virginia Prevention of Sex Trafficking Fund to be used in accordance with §

9.1-116.4

.

History.

2019, c. 728; 2020, c. 122; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 188.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 122 substituted “§

18.2-346

et seq.” for “§

18.2-344

et seq.” in the first sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 188, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “§

18.2-346.01

” for “subsection B of §

18.2-346

” in the first sentence.

§ 17.1-275.14.
Additional fee for Virginia State Police Electronic Summons System Fund.

In addition to the fees provided for by §§ 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-69.48:1.01,

17.1-275.1

,

17.1-275.2

,

17.1-275.3

,

17.1-275.4

,

17.1-275.5

,

17.1-275.7

,

17.1-275.8

,

17.1-275.9

,

17.1-275.1

0,

17.1-275.11

,

17.1-275.12

, and

17.1-275.13

, a fee of $5 shall be assessed as court costs in each criminal or traffic case in which the Virginia State Police issued the summons, ticket, or citation. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the state treasury and credited to the Virginia State Police Electronic Summons System Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia State Police Electronic Summons System Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected under this section, moneys appropriated directly to the Fund, and any other grants or gifts made to the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of funding software, hardware, and associated equipment costs for the implementation and maintenance of an electronic summons system. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Superintendent of the Virginia State Police or his designee.

History.

2020, c. 342.

§ 17.1-276.
Fee allowed for providing secure remote access to land records.

A clerk of the circuit court who provides secure remote access to land records pursuant to §

17.1-294

may charge a fee as provided in this section. The fee shall be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to be used to cover operational expenses as defined in §

17.1-295

. The clerk may charge a flat clerk’s fee to be assessed for each subscriber, as defined in §

17.1-295

, in an amount not to exceed $50 per month and a separate fee per image downloaded in an amount not to exceed the fee provided in subdivision A 8 of §

17.1-275

. The clerk’s fees shall be used to cover operational expenses as defined in § 17.1-295.The Office of the Attorney General, the Division of Debt Collection, the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Outdoors Foundation, the Department of Historic Resources, the Department of General Services, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Forestry, the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority, the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, and the State Corporation Commission shall be exempt from paying any fee for remote access to land records. If any clerk contracts with an outside vendor to provide remote access to land records to subscribers, such contract shall contain a provision exempting the Office of the Attorney General, the Division of Debt Collection, the Department of Transportation, the Virginia Outdoors Foundation, the Department of Historic Resources, the Department of General Services, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Forestry, the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority, the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, and the State Corporation Commission from paying any access or subscription fee.

The circuit court clerk shall enter into an agreement with each person whom the clerk authorizes to have remote access, in accordance with the security standards established by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency. Any such agreement between a state agency or employee thereof acting in the employee’s official capacity and the clerk or an outside vendor contracted by the clerk to provide remote access to land records to subscribers, or such an agreement between a state agency or employee thereof acting in the employee’s official capacity and both the clerk and the outside vendor, shall not contain any provision requiring the state agency or employee thereof acting in the employee’s official capacity to indemnify the clerk or the vendor. Any such agreement between a state agency and the clerk or an outside vendor shall provide that the state agency is required to monitor its employees’ activity under such agreement to ensure compliance with its terms.

The clerk may establish a program under which the clerk assesses a reasonable convenience fee that shall not exceed $2 per transaction for remote access to land records and a separate fee per image downloaded in an amount not to exceed the fee provided in subdivision A 8 of §

17.1-275

.

Nothing herein shall be construed to require the use by the general public of the secure remote access to land records made available by the clerk, and such records may continue to be accessed in person in the clerk’s office.

History.

1985, c. 489, § 14.1-118.1; 1993, c. 445; 1995, c. 592; 1997, c. 413; 1998, cc. 650, 872; 2004, c. 230; 2006, c. 474; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2009, cc. 76, 723, 797; 2010, c. 430; 2011, cc. 434, 493; 2012, cc. 234, 469, 780; 2013, c. 77; 2015, cc. 65, 174; 2019, c. 611; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 124.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 650, amended § 14.1-118.1, which was repealed by Acts 1998, c. 872, effective October 1, 1998. At the direction of the Code Commission, effect has been given in this section, as set out above, to Acts 1998, c. 650. In accordance with c. 650, the amendment, in the first sentence, substituted “electronic” for “remote,” deleted “internet” following “including,” inserted “through the global information system known as the Internet,” substituted “may” for “shall” following “17.1-226,” inserted “clerk or by the,” deleted “in order” following “computer support,” and substituted “replacements” for “future replacement”; substituted “The” for “Such” in the second sentence; rewrote the third sentence; and in the fourth sentence, substituted “In addition” for “Furthermore” and inserted “users.”

Acts 2009, cc. 76 and 723, cl. 2, which had provided for an expiration date for subsection B, was repealed by Acts 2012, c. 780, cl. 2.

Acts 2009, c. 797, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

17.1-276

of the Code of Virginia shall not void any contractual provision in existence prior to July 1, 2009. The provisions of this act amending §

17.1-276

shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2009, c. 797, cl. 3, provides: “That no provisions of this act or any components of this act shall affect the collection of any amounts owed to the Commonwealth for taxes administered by the Department of Taxation.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 230 added “or as a flat rate fee” at the end of the second sentence; substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars” in the last sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 474 deleted “the global information system known as” preceding “the Internet” in the first sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and rewrote this section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 76 and 723 are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B. For September 30, 2012 expiration of amendments, see Editor’s note.

The 2009 amendment by c. 797 added the last paragraph in subsection A. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 430, in subsection A, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, inserted “as provided in this section” and deleted “of such electronic access, including, but not limited to, computer support, maintenance, enhancements, upgrades, replacements, and consulting services” from the end, inserted the second sentence, and in the fourth sentence, substituted “the clerk’s” for “a special” and deleted “of such electronic access, as defined herein” from the end.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 434 and 493 are identical, and twice inserted “the Department of Transportation, and the Department of Rail and Public Transportation” in the last paragraph in subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 234, inserted “, including locating technology in an offsite facility for such purposes or for the implementation of a disaster recovery plan” in clause (iii) in subsection A.

The 2012 amendment by c. 469, in subsection A, in the last paragraph, inserted “the” preceding “Division of Debt Collection” in two places and “the Virginia Outdoors Foundation” following “Department of Transportation” in two places.

The 2012 amendment by c. 780, in subsection A, deleted “be paid to the clerk’s office and deposited by the clerk into the clerk’s nonreverting local fund to” following “The fee shall” in the next-to-last sentence of the first paragraph. Language concerning depositing fees is now found in subsection E of §

17.1-275

. In subsection B, deleted “pilot” before “program” and substituted “reasonable convenience fee that shall not exceed $2 per transaction for remote access” for “daily fee for remote access” and deleted the last two sentences which concerned reports on the pilot program.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 77, in the first paragraph of subsection A, deleted “established by the clerk to cover the operational expenses” at the end of the first sentence, substituted the second sentence for the former, which related to operational expenses, substituted “The clerk may charge a flat clerk’s fee to be” for “A flat fee may be” at the beginning, and added “and a separate fee per image downloaded in an amount not to exceed the fee provided in subdivision A 8 of §

17.1-275

” at the end of the third sentence, substituted “The clerk’s fees” for “The fee” at the beginning, and added “as defined in §

17.1-295

” at the end, of the fourth sentence; deleted “of the Circuit Court of Prince William County” following “The clerk” at the beginning of subsection B; and added subsection C.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 65 inserted “the Department of Historic Resources” twice in the second paragraph in subsection A.

The 2015 amendment by c. 174 deleted the last sentence in the first paragraph of subsection A, which read “The circuit court clerk shall enter into an agreement with each person whom the clerk authorizes to have remote access, in accordance with the security standards established by the Virginia Information Technologies Agency.”; added subsection B and redesignated former subsections B and C as subsections C and D.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 611, in the second paragraph of subsection A, inserted “the Department of General Services, the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Forestry, the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” twice; and added the last sentence to subsection B.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 124, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “and the State Corporation Commission” twice in the second paragraph of subsection A, and made related changes.

§ 17.1-277.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 831, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2003.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to fixed fees for traffic infractions, see § 16.1-69.48:1.

§ 17.1-278.
Additional fees in certain courts; use by Virginia State Bar.

In addition to the fees prescribed by § 16.1-69.48:2 and subdivision A 13 of §

17.1-275

and to be collected by the clerk of the circuit or general district court upon the filing of papers for the commencement of civil actions in such courts, the following additional fees shall be collected in all cities and counties in which civil legal representation is provided for the poor, without charge, by a nonprofit legal aid program organized under the auspices of the Virginia State Bar: (i) upon commencement of a civil action in such circuit court, an additional fee of $10 and (ii) upon commencement of a civil action in such general district court, an additional fee of $10.

The additional fees prescribed by this action shall be collected by the clerk at the time of the filing. The amounts so collected shall be paid by the clerk to the state treasury and credited as follows: (i) $9 to a special fund within the Virginia State Bar fund to be designated the Legal Aid Services Fund, and (ii) $1 to the general fund for funding of the district courts of the Commonwealth. Such amount for the district courts shall be used to assist indigent litigants. Such amounts credited to the Legal Aid Services Fund shall be disbursed by the Virginia State Bar by check from the State Treasurer upon a warrant of the Comptroller to nonprofit legal aid programs organized under the auspices of the Virginia State Bar through the Legal Services Corporation of Virginia to assist in defraying the costs of such programs. However, the additional fees prescribed by this section shall not be collected in actions initiated by any local government or by the Commonwealth.

History.

1992, cc. 249, 749, § 14.1-125.1; 1998, c. 872; 2002, c. 318; 2004, c. 925; 2005, c. 681; 2006, c. 189; 2008, c. 692.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 925, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall only become effective if the general appropriation act for the period July 1, 2004, through June 30, 2006, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor, includes an appropriation of general funds for a total of 49 additional positions allocated amongst the general district courts, juvenile and domestic relations district courts, and combined district courts, such additional positions being in addition to the total positions for such courts as of June 30, 2004; and if such appropriation is included as provided herein, then the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2006.” The appropriation was made in Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. 1, c. 4. See Item 41.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 318 substituted “four dollars” for “two dollars” in clauses (i) and (ii) in the first paragraph; and in the second paragraph, inserted “as follows: (i) three dollars” and inserted clause (ii) in the second sentence, inserted the present third sentence, and inserted “credited to the Legal Aid Services Fund” in the present fourth sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 925, in the first paragraph, deleted “§” preceding “16.1-69.48:2” and inserted “subdivision A 13 of §” preceding “17.1-275” and deleted “A 13” thereafter; substituted “$5” for “four dollars” twice at the end; in the second paragraph, substituted “$4” for “three dollars” and “$1” for “one dollar” in the first sentence. For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “subdivision A 13 of §

17.1-275

” for “17.1-275 A 13,” “a civil action in such” for “an action whether at law or in chancery in such” and made minor stylistic changes; and substituted “commencement of a civil action in such” for “commencement of an action whether at law or in chancery in such” in clause (i) of the first paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 189 substituted “$5” for “$4” twice in the first paragraph; and substituted “$4” for “$3” in the second sentence of the last paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 692, in the first paragraph, substituted “$10” for “$5” twice; and in the second paragraph, substituted “$9” for “$4.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 5-721. Warrant in Detinue.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A Clerk of Court may install recording systems

into a Circuit Court, General District Court, and/or Juvenile and Domestic Relations Court and require such systems to be on at all times court is in session and, further, that the Clerk may charge a fee for access to such recordings provided that confidentiality is maintained for all proceedings as required by the Virginia Code or Court orders. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 10-063, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 40 (8/2/10).